Illinois, session 104th, SB71.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Safety Drill Act is amended by 5changing Sections 5, 10, 15, and 25 and by adding Section 65 as 6follows: 7    (105 ILCS 128/5)8    Sec. 5. Definitions. In this Act:9    "Emergency services and disaster agency" means an agency 10by the name "emergency services and disaster agency", by the 11name "emergency management agency", or by any other name that 12is established by ordinance within a political subdivision to 13coordinate the emergency management program within that 14political subdivision with private organizations, other 15political subdivisions, and the State and federal governments. 16    "First responder" means and includes all fire departments 17and districts, law enforcement agencies and officials, 18emergency medical responders, emergency medical dispatchers, 19and emergency management officials involved in the execution 20and documentation of the drills administered under this Act.21    "Hazardous substance" has the meaning given to that term 22in Section 3.215 of the Environmental Protection Act, except 23that, as used in this Act, "hazardous substance" also includes   SB0071 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07353 LNS 17393 b1radioactive materials, hydrocarbons, petroleum, gasoline, and 2crude oil or any products, by-products, or fractions thereof.3    "Local emergency planning committee" means the committee 4that is appointed for an emergency planning district under 5Section 301 of the federal Emergency Planning and Community 6Right-to-Know Act of 1986.7    "School" means a public or private facility that offers 8elementary or secondary education to students under the age of 921. As used in this definition, "public facility" means a 10facility operated by the State or by a unit of local 11government. As used in this definition, "private facility" 12means any non-profit, non-home-based, non-public elementary or 13secondary school that is in compliance with Title VI of the 14Civil Rights Act of 1964 and attendance at which satisfies the 15requirements of Section 26-1 of the School Code. While more 16than one school may be housed in a facility, for purposes of 17this Act, the facility shall be considered a school. When a 18school has more than one location, for purposes of this Act, 19each different location shall be considered its own school.20    "School district" means any public school district 21established under the School Code, any program of a special 22education joint agreement established under Section 3-15.14, 2310-22.31, or 10-22.31a of the School Code, or any charter 24school authorized by the State Board of Education in 25accordance with Section 27A-7.5 of the School Code. 26    "School safety drill" means a pre-planned exercise   SB0071 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07353 LNS 17393 b1conducted by a school in accordance with the drills and 2requirements set forth in this Act.3(Source: P.A. 102-894, eff. 5-20-22; 102-1006, eff. 1-1-23; 4103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-175, eff. 6-30-23.) 5    (105 ILCS 128/10)6    Sec. 10. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is (i) to 7establish minimum requirements and standards for schools to 8follow when conducting school safety drills and reviewing 9school emergency and crisis response plans and, beginning July 101, 2027, hazardous substance release procedures and (ii) to 11encourage schools and first responders to work together for 12the safety of children. Communities and schools may exceed 13these requirements and standards.14(Source: P.A. 94-600, eff. 8-16-05.) 15    (105 ILCS 128/15)16    Sec. 15. Types of drills. Under this Act, the following 17school safety drills shall be instituted by all schools in 18this State:19        (1) School evacuation drills, which shall address and 20    prepare students and school personnel for situations that 21    occur when conditions outside of a school building are 22    safer than inside a school building. Evacuation incidents 23    are based on the needs of particular communities and may 24    include without limitation the following:  SB0071 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07353 LNS 17393 b1            (A) fire;2            (B) suspicious items or persons;3            (C) incidents involving hazardous materials, 4        including, but not limited to, chemical, incendiary, 5        and explosives; and6            (D) bomb threats; and . 7            (E) incidents involving the release or explosion 8        of hazardous substances. 9        (2) Except as limited by subsection (b-5) of Section 10    20 of this Act, bus evacuation drills, which shall address 11    and prepare students and school personnel for situations 12    that occur when conditions outside of a bus are safer than 13    inside the bus. Evacuation incidents are based on the 14    needs of particular communities and may include without 15    limitation the following:16            (A) fire;17            (B) suspicious items; and18            (C) incidents involving hazardous materials, 19        including, but not limited to, chemical, incendiary, 20        and explosives; and .21            (D) incidents involving the release or explosion 22        of hazardous substances. 23        (3) Law enforcement drills, which shall address and 24    prepare school personnel for situations calling for the 25    involvement of law enforcement when conditions inside a 26    school building are safer than outside of a school   SB0071 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 07353 LNS 17393 b1    building and it is necessary to protect building occupants 2    from potential dangers in a school building. Law 3    enforcement drills may involve situations that call for 4    the reverse-evacuation or the lock-down of a school 5    building. Evacuation or reverse-evacuation incidents shall 6    include a shooting incident.7        (4) Severe weather and shelter-in-place drills, which 8    shall address and prepare students for situations 9    involving severe weather emergencies or the release of 10    external gas or chemicals. Severe weather and 11    shelter-in-place incidents shall be based on the needs and 12    environment of particular communities and may include 13    without limitation the following:14            (A) severe weather, including, but not limited to, 15        shear winds, lightning, and earthquakes;16            (B) incidents involving hazardous materials, 17        including, but not limited to, chemical, incendiary, 18        and explosives; and19            (C) incidents involving weapons of mass 20        destruction, including, but not limited to, 21        biological, chemical, and nuclear weapons; and .22            (D) incidents involving the release or explosion 23        of hazardous materials. 24(Source: P.A. 100-443, eff. 8-25-17.) 25    (105 ILCS 128/25)  SB0071 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 07353 LNS 17393 b1    Sec. 25. Annual review. 2    (a) Each public school district, through its school board 3or the board's designee, shall conduct a minimum of one annual 4meeting at which it will review each school building's 5emergency and crisis response plans, protocols, and 6procedures, including procedures regarding the school 7district's threat assessment team, the school district's 8hazardous substance release procedures, procedures regarding 9the school district's cardiac emergency response plan, the 10efficacy and effects of law enforcement drills, and each 11building's compliance with the school safety drill programs. 12The purpose of this annual review shall be to review and update 13the emergency and crisis response plans, protocols, and 14procedures and the school safety drill programs of the 15district and each of its school buildings. This review must be 16at no cost to the school district. In updating a school 17building's emergency and crisis response plans, consideration 18may be given to making the emergency and crisis response plans 19available to first responders, administrators, and teachers 20for implementation and utilization through the use of 21electronic applications on electronic devices, including, but 22not limited to, smartphones, tablets, and laptop computers.23    (b) Each school board or the board's designee is required 24to participate in the annual review and to invite each of the 25following parties to the annual review and provide each party 26with a minimum of 30 days' notice before the date of the annual   SB0071 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 07353 LNS 17393 b1review:2        (1) The principal of each school within the school 3    district or his or her official designee.4        (2) Representatives from any other education-related 5    organization or association deemed appropriate by the 6    school district.7        (3) Representatives from all local first responder 8    organizations to participate, advise, and consult in the 9    review process, including, but not limited to:10            (A) the appropriate local fire department or 11        district;12            (B) the appropriate local law enforcement agency;13            (C) the appropriate local emergency medical 14        services agency if the agency is a separate, local 15        first responder unit; and16            (D) any other member of the first responder or 17        emergency management community that has contacted the 18        district superintendent or his or her designee during 19        the past year to request involvement in a school's 20        emergency planning or drill process; and .21            (E) the applicable emergency services and disaster 22        agency or the applicable local emergency planning 23        committee. 24        (4) The school board or its designee may also choose 25    to invite to the annual review any other persons whom it 26    believes will aid in the review process, including, but   SB0071 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 07353 LNS 17393 b1    not limited to, any members of any other education-related 2    organization or the first responder or emergency 3    management community.4    (c) Upon the conclusion of the annual review, the school 5board or the board's designee shall sign a one page report, 6which may be in either a check-off format or a narrative 7format, that does the following:8        (1) summarizes the review's recommended changes to the 9    existing school safety plans and drill plans;10        (2) lists the parties that participated in the annual 11    review, and includes the annual review's attendance 12    record;13        (3) certifies that an effective review of the 14    emergency and crisis response plans, protocols, and 15    procedures and the school safety drill programs of the 16    district and each of its school buildings has occurred;17        (4) states that the school district will implement 18    those plans, protocols, procedures, and programs, during 19    the academic year; and20        (5) includes the authorization of the school board or 21    the board's designee.22    (d) The school board or its designee shall send a copy of 23the report to each party that participates in the annual 24review process and to the appropriate regional superintendent 25of schools. If any of the participating parties have comments 26on the certification document, those parties shall submit   SB0071 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 07353 LNS 17393 b1their comments in writing to the appropriate regional 2superintendent. The regional superintendent shall maintain a 3record of these comments. The certification document may be in 4a check-off format or narrative format, at the discretion of 5the district superintendent.6    (e) The review must occur at least once during the fiscal 7year, at a specific time chosen at the school district 8superintendent's discretion.9    (f) A private school shall conduct a minimum of one annual 10meeting at which the school must review each school building's 11emergency and crisis response plans, protocols, and 12procedures, including procedures regarding the school's 13cardiac emergency response plan, and each building's 14compliance with the school safety drill programs of the 15school. The purpose of this annual review shall be to review 16and update the emergency and crisis response plans, protocols, 17and procedures and the school safety drill programs of the 18school. This review must be at no cost to the private school.19    The private school shall invite representatives from all 20local first responder organizations to participate, advise, 21and consult in the review process, including, but not limited 22to, the following:23        (1) the appropriate local fire department or fire 24    protection district;25        (2) the appropriate local law enforcement agency;26        (3) the appropriate local emergency medical services   SB0071 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 07353 LNS 17393 b1    agency if the agency is a separate, local first responder 2    unit; and3        (4) any other member of the first responder or 4    emergency management community that has contacted the 5    school's chief administrative officer or his or her 6    designee during the past year to request involvement in 7    the school's emergency planning or drill process. 8(Source: P.A. 102-395, eff. 8-16-21; 103-608, eff. 1-1-25.) 9    (105 ILCS 128/65 new)10    Sec. 65. Hazardous substance release guidance and 11procedures. 12    (a) By January 1, 2027, the Illinois Emergency Management 13Agency and Office of Homeland Security, in consultation with 14the State Board of Education, shall develop and provide 15guidance for all local emergency planning committees, 16emergency services and disaster agencies, and school districts 17in the State specifically related to the potential impact to 18school districts of a release or explosion of a hazardous 19substance. This guidance shall be posted on the Internet 20website of the State Board of Education.21    (b) The guidance developed under subsection (a) shall 22include:23        (1) a description of the methods and procedures to be 24    followed by school personnel in response to a release or 25    explosion of a hazardous substance;  SB0071 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 07353 LNS 17393 b1        (2) a description of the federal, State, or local 2    agencies, including first responders, responsible for 3    identifying whether the release or explosion of a 4    hazardous substance has occurred and how that information 5    will be communicated to school personnel, including any 6    appropriate precautions school districts should take to 7    protect their students and staff and how the wind 8    direction may impact their evacuation plans;9        (3) recommendations for school evacuation plans, 10    including recommendations for an alternative plan if 11    advised by federal, State, or local agencies, including 12    first responders, that one is needed due to the wind 13    direction;14        (4) a list of available training programs;15        (5) a description of recommended communication 16    protocols for school districts with first responders, 17    local law enforcement agencies, and other local, State, or 18    federal emergency management agencies; and19        (6) a list of instructions for school districts on how 20    to identify their applicable local emergency planning 21    committee or emergency services and disaster agency.22    (c) By July 1, 2027, each school district shall, in 23consultation with the applicable local emergency planning 24committee or emergency services and disaster agency, develop 25procedures for each of its schools to address the release or 26explosion of a hazardous substance based on the guidance   SB0071 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 07353 LNS 17393 b1developed under subsection (a). However, a school district is 2not required to develop procedures until the school year 3following when the publication of the guidance provided in 4subsection (a) is made available on the website of the State 5Board of Education.6    (d) Each school district shall make available to all 7school personnel relevant and appropriate information related 8to the procedures in subsection (c), including identified 9evacuation plans, as well as alternative evacuation plans, 10safe locations where student and staff can seek shelter, and a 11description of how that information will be communicated to 12school personnel in such an emergency.